Washington statutes.
RCW 15.30.140

Maturity and condition standards may be higher than for fruit and vegetables not subject to chapter.

The director may by rule establish condition and maturity standards for fruits or vegetables subject to the provisions of this chapter which may be higher than maturity and condition standards established for similar grades or classifications of such fruits or vegetables which are not subject to the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1961 c 29 s 14.]